Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 701.
Definitions.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to section 752 of this chapter, as used in this chapter:

“Certificate of approval” means an authorization by the Board of Liquor and Lottery pursuant to section 274 of this title to a manufacturer or distributor of malt beverages or vinous beverages, or both, not licensed under the provisions of this title, to sell those beverages to holders of a packager’s or wholesale dealer’s license issued by the Board pursuant to section 272 or 273 of this title.

“Franchise” or “agreement” shall mean one or more of the following:

a commercial relationship between a wholesale dealer and a certificate of approval holder or a manufacturer of a definite duration or indefinite duration that is or is not in writing and has been in existence for at least one year;

a relationship that has been in existence for at least one year in which the wholesale dealer is granted the right to offer and sell the brands of malt beverages or vinous beverages offered by the certificate of approval holder or manufacturer;

a relationship that has been in existence for at least one year in which the wholesale dealer, as an independent business, constitutes a component of a certificate of approval holder’s or manufacturer’s distribution system;

a relationship that has been in existence for at least one year in which the wholesale dealer’s business is substantially associated with the certificate of approval holder’s or manufacturer’s brand, advertising, or other commercial symbol designating the manufacturer;

a relationship that has been in existence for at least one year in which the wholesale dealer’s business is substantially reliant on the certificate of approval holder or manufacturer for the continued supply of malt beverages or vinous beverages; or

a written or oral arrangement for a definite or indefinite period that has been in existence for at least one year in which a certificate of approval holder or manufacturer grants to a wholesale dealer a license to use a trade name, trademark, service mark, or related characteristic, and in which there is a community of interest in the marketing of goods or services at wholesale, retail, by lease, or otherwise.

“Franchisee” means any malt beverages or vinous beverages wholesale dealer to whom a franchise or agreement as defined in this section is granted or offered, or any malt beverages or vinous beverages certificate of approval holder or manufacturer who is a party to a franchise or agreement as defined in this section.

“Franchisor” means any malt beverages or vinous beverages certificate of approval holder or manufacturer who enters into any franchise or agreement with a malt beverages or vinous beverages wholesale dealer, or any malt beverages or vinous beverages certificate of approval holder or manufacturer who is a party to a franchise or agreement as defined in this section.

“Territory” or “sales territory” means the area of sales responsibility designated by any agreement or franchise between any franchisee or franchisor for the brand or brands of any franchisor or manufacturer.

“Brand” and “brands” are synonymous with label and labels.

“Wholesale dealer” means a packager licensed pursuant to section 272 of this title or a wholesale dealer licensed pursuant to section 273 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 83

, § 121;

2017, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2019;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 81.

§ 702.
Prohibited acts by manufacturer or certificate of approval holder.

A manufacturer or certificate of approval holder shall not do any of the following:

Induce or coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any wholesale dealer to accept delivery of any alcoholic beverage, any form of advertisement, or any other commodity, that was not ordered by the wholesale dealer.

Induce or coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any wholesale dealer to do any illegal act or thing by threatening to cancel or terminate the wholesale dealer’s malt beverages or vinous beverages franchise agreement.

Fail or refuse to deliver promptly to a wholesale dealer after the receipt of its order any malt beverages or vinous beverages when the product is available for immediate sale. If a manufacturer or certificate of approval holder believes in good faith that it does not have a sufficient amount of a product available for immediate sale to satisfy the demand of a wholesale dealer and its other customers, it shall allocate the available product between the wholesale dealer and its other customers in a fair and equitable manner.

Require a wholesale dealer to agree to any condition, stipulation, or provision limiting the wholesale dealer’s rights to sell the product of another manufacturer or certificate of approval holder.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2017, No. 83

, § 122;

2017, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 703.
Cancellation of franchise.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise, no certificate of approval holder or manufacturer shall cancel, terminate, or refuse to continue a franchise, or cause a wholesale dealer to relinquish a franchise, unless good cause is shown to exist.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2017, No. 83

, § 123.

§ 704.
120 days’ notice for cancellation; rectification.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a certificate of approval holder or manufacturer shall provide a franchisee or agreement holder at least 120 days’ written notice of any intent to terminate or cancel any franchise or agreement.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a certificate of approval holder or manufacturer shall provide a franchisee or agreement holder at least 120 days’ written notice of any intent to terminate or cancel any franchise or agreement.

The notice shall state the causes and reasons for the intended termination or cancellation. The franchisee shall have 120 days in which to rectify any claimed deficiency.

The Superior Court, upon petition and after due notice to both parties and the opportunity to be heard, shall decide whether good cause exists to allow termination or cancellation of the franchise or agreement.

The notice provisions of subsection (a) of this section may be waived if the reason for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is insolvency, the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, bankruptcy, or if the certificate of approval holder or manufacturer is able to prove to the court that providing the required notice would do irreparable harm to the marketing of its product.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 83

, § 124.

§ 705.
Exclusive territories.

No certificate of approval holder or manufacturer, who designates a sales territory for which a wholesale dealer shall be primarily responsible or in which a wholesale dealer is required to concentrate its efforts, shall enter into any franchise or agreement with any other wholesale dealer for the purpose of establishing an additional franchisee for its brand or brands of malt beverages or vinous beverages in the territory being primarily served or concentrated upon by the first licensed wholesale dealer.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 83

, § 125.

§ 706.
Sale to retailers by franchisees.

No franchisee that is granted a sales territory for which the franchisee shall be primarily responsible or in which the franchisee is required to concentrate its efforts shall make any sale or delivery of malt beverages or vinous beverages to any retail licensee whose place of business is not within the sales territory granted to the franchisee.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.); amended

2017, No. 83

, § 126.

§ 707.
Sale or transfer; purchase by manufacturer.

A wholesale dealer wishing to sell or otherwise transfer its interests in a franchise shall give at least 90 days’ written notice to the certificate of approval holder or manufacturer, prior to the sale or transfer. The notice of intended sale or transfer shall give the full name and address of the proposed transferee, along with full details outlining the qualifications of the proposed transferee which, in the opinion of the wholesale dealer, make the proposed transferee competent to operate the franchise.

In the event the certificate of approval holder or manufacturer wishes to resist the proposed sale or transfer to the proposed transferee, the certificate of approval holder or manufacturer shall petition the Superior Court for a hearing no later than 60 days prior to the date of the proposed sale or transfer. The petition shall clearly state the certificate of approval holder’s or manufacturer’s reasons for resisting the proposed sale or transfer.

Upon receipt of a petition brought resisting a sale or transfer, the Superior Court shall hold a hearing on the proposed transfer or sale. The court shall make a full inquiry into the qualifications of the proposed transferee and shall determine whether or not the proposed transferee is in a position to substantially continue the operations of the franchise, to assume the obligations of the franchise holder, and to conduct the business in a manner that will protect the legitimate interests of the certificate of approval holder or manufacturer.

If the Superior Court finds the proposed transferee to be qualified to operate the franchise, it shall approve the transfer of the franchise to the proposed transferee.

The provisions of subsections (b) through (d) of this section shall not apply to the sale or transfer of a franchise to the spouse, child, grandchild, sibling, parent, foster child, child-in-law, sibling-in-law, niece, or nephew of the owner of the wholesale dealer.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2017, No. 83

, § 127;

2017, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 708.
Merger of franchisor.

Once a franchise has been in effect for a period of one year, the merger of the franchisor and a third party shall not void the franchise unless a waiver is received from the franchisee or unless good cause is shown pursuant to section 703 of this title and in accordance with the procedures established in section 704 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 128.

§ 709.
Heirs, successors, and assigns.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the heirs, successors, and assigns of any franchisor or franchisee.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 129.

§ 710.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 129.